Alaska, session 34, HB93.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 16.05.400 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (d) A person issued a permanent identification card under (b) of this section 06 may sport fish, hunt, or trap under the identification card only if the person continues 07 to meet the residency requirements of AS 16.05.415. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 16.05.415(a) is amended to read: 09 (a) In AS 16.05.330 - 16.05.430, a person, except as provided in (c) - (f) of 10 this section, is a resident if the person 11 (1) is physically present in the state with the intent to remain in the 12 state indefinitely and to make a home in the state; 13 (2) has maintained the person's domicile in the state for the 12 14 consecutive months immediately preceding the application for a license; 01 (3) has been physically present in the state at all times during the 02 12 consecutive months under (2) of this subsection or, if absent, was absent only 03 as allowed in AS 43.23.008; 04 (4) is not claiming residency in another state, territory, or country; and 05 (5) [(4)] is not obtaining benefits under a claim of residency in another 06 state, territory, or country. 07 * Sec. 3. AS 16.05.415(e) is amended to read: 08 (e) A person who is an alien is a resident for the purposes of AS 16.05.330 - 09 16.05.430 if the person 10 (1) is physically present in the state with the intent to remain in the 11 state indefinitely and to make a home in the state; 12 (2) has maintained the person's domicile in the state for the 12 13 consecutive months immediately preceding the application for a license; 14 (3) has been physically present in the state at all times during the 15 12 consecutive months under (2) of this subsection or, if absent, was absent only 16 as allowed in AS 43.23.008; 17 (4) is not claiming residency in another state, territory, or country; and 18 (5) [(4)] is not obtaining benefits under a claim of residency in another 19 state, territory, or country. 20 * Sec. 4. AS 16.05.415 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 21 (j) The commissioner shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative 22 Procedure Act) for determining the eligibility of an individual for licensure as a 23 resident under this section. The commissioner may require an individual to provide 24 proof of eligibility, and the commissioner may use other information available from 25 other state departments or agencies to determine the eligibility of an individual. The 26 commissioner shall consider all relevant circumstances in determining the eligibility 27 of an individual. 28 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect January 1, 2028. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.